California, session 20252026, SB1339.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. It is the intent of the Legislature to enact legislation to strengthen diversion statutes as set forth in Chapter 2.7 (commencing with Section 1001) of Title 6 of Part 2 of the Penal Code to ensure they operate in a manner that protects the public, supports victims, and maintains accountability for individuals who engage in criminal conduct.